Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4798.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1901. As used in this part: (a) Board means the Michigan natural resources trust fund board established in section 1905. (b) Local unit of government or public authority means a county, city, township, village, school district, recreational authority, the Huron-Clinton metropolitan authority, or any authority composed of counties, cities, townships, villages, or school districts, or any combination of these entities, and legally constituted to provide public recreation. As used in this subdivision, recreational authority means an authority established under the recreational authorities act, 2000 PA 321, MCL 123.1131 to 123.1157. (c) Michigan state parks endowment fund means the Michigan state parks endowment fund established in section 35a of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 and provided for in section 74119. (d) Trust fund means the Michigan natural resources trust fund established in section 35 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4694 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor